Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 29D.1 Information sharing ââ school safety. 1. For purposes of this section: a. (1) âCovered entityâ includes all of the following: (a) A criminal or juvenile justice agency as defined in section 692.1. (b) A city, county, or township. (c) A state agency. (d) Any service or support provider that contracts with an entity described in subparagraph divisions (a) through (c). (2) âCovered entityâ does not include the judicial branch. b. âSchoolâ means all of the following: (1) A school corporation organized under chapter 274. (2) A nonpublic school as defined in section 280.2. (3) A charter school established pursuant to chapter 256E. (4) A charter school or innovation zone school established pursuant to chapter 256F. (5) Any service or support provider that contracts with an entity described in subparagraphs (1) through (4). Senate File 583, p. 2 c. âState agencyâ means a department, board, bureau, commission, or other agency or authority of the state of Iowa. 2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including section 22.7, any covered entity or school that provides services to students enrolled in kindergarten through grade twelve who are experiencing or at risk of an emotional disturbance or mental illness, or who pose an articulable and significant threat to the health and safety of any person, shall, upon the request of another covered entity or school when the covered entity or school is acting as part of a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team established pursuant to section 280.36, share records or information that are reasonably necessary to ensure access to appropriate services for such students, or to ensure the safety of such students or others, with any other such covered entity or school. 3. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including section 22.7, a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team established pursuant to section 280.36 may request and receive records or information that are related to students enrolled in kindergarten through grade twelve who are experiencing or at risk of an emotional disturbance or mental illness, or who pose an articulable and significant threat to the health and safety of any person. 4. When acting as part of a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team established pursuant to section 280.36, a covered entity and a school may communicate, collaborate, and coordinate efforts with other covered entities to best serve students enrolled in kindergarten through grade twelve who are experiencing or at risk of an emotional disturbance or mental illness, or who pose an articulable and significant threat to the health and safety of any person. Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 29D.1 relating to the sharing of records or information, and the communication, collaboration, and coordination of efforts to best serve students, in the same manner as a school district. Senate File 583, p. 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 280.36 relating to the establishment of a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraphs: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0d. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 29D.1 relating to the sharing of records or information, and the communication, collaboration, and coordination of efforts to best serve students, in the same manner as a school district. NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of section 280.36 relating to the establishment of a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team in the same manner as a school district. Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Multidisciplinary school safety assessment teams ââ immunity. 1. The board of directors of each school district and the authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school may establish a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team. If established, the multidisciplinary school safety assessment team shall coordinate resources and assess and intervene when a student enrolled in the school district or accredited nonpublic school exhibits behavior that may pose a threat to the safety of the school district or accredited nonpublic school, employees of the school district or accredited nonpublic school, or other student enrolled in the school district or accredited nonpublic school. 2. The multidisciplinary school safety assessment team may consist of any of the following members: a. A local law enforcement official. b. A representative from juvenile court services. c. A mental health professional. d. A social services representative. e. A school official. 3. The board of directors of a school district or the authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school may enter into an agreement with another school district, accredited nonpublic school, charter school, or innovation zone Senate File 583, p. 4 school to create a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team that shall coordinate resources among the schools and assess and intervene when a student enrolled in either school exhibits behavior that may pose a threat to the safety of either school, employees of either school, or students enrolled in either school. 4. A multidisciplinary school safety assessment team may do any of the following: a. Share or request records or information in accordance with section 29D.1. b. Request records from the state court administrator. 5. In addition to any other immunity available, any person who, in good faith with reasonable cause and without malice, acts to report, investigate, or cause any investigation to be made into the activities of a student or other person as such report or investigation relates to conduct or information indicating that the student or person poses a credible danger of serious bodily injury or death to one or more students, school employees, or others on school property shall be immune from all criminal and civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as the result of the making of such a report, investigation, or disclosure. 6. Notwithstanding sections 22.7, 232.147, 232.149, 232.149A, and 232.151, a representative from juvenile court services who is a member of a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team may share records or information among the other members of the multidisciplinary school safety assessment team if the records or information are reasonably necessary to ensure the safety of students or others, and if the records or information are not sealed by a court order. 7. a. Notwithstanding sections 22.7, 232.147, 232.149, 232.149A, and 232.151, upon the request of a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team, the state court administrator shall disclose to the multidisciplinary school safety assessment team a record if the record is reasonably necessary to ensure the safety of students or others, and if the record is not sealed by a court order. b. Paragraph âaâ shall not be construed to prohibit a multidisciplinary school safety assessment team from submitting Senate File 583, p. 5 an application to the state court administrator for release of a record pursuant to any other authority established by law. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 583, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor